Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [624.7135] FIREARM PURCHASE BY PEACE OFFICERS. new text end new text begin An actively licensed Minnesota peace officer may purchase a firearm under this chapter by presenting the peace officer's badge or other officially issued government identification demonstrating that the person is currently employed as a peace officer in Minnesota, along with photo identification sufficient to prove the officer's identity. This proof shall be considered as the equivalent of presenting a transferee permit for the purchase of the firearm. new text end